Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 466.01, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Municipality. For the purposes of sections 466.01 to 466.15, "municipality" means any city, whether organized under home rule charter or otherwise, any county, town, public authority, public corporation, nonprofit firefighting corporation that has associated with it a relief association as defined in section 424A.001, subdivision 4, special district, school district, however organized,new text begin water or sewer system formed under chapter 116A,new text end county agricultural society organized pursuant to chapter 38, joint powers board or organization created under section 471.59 or other statute, public library, regional public library system, multicounty multitype library system, the following local collaboratives whose plans have been approved by the Children's Cabinet: family services collaboratives established under section 142D.15, children's mental health collaboratives established under sections 245.491 to 245.495, or a collaborative established by the merger of a children's mental health collaborative and a family services collaborative, other political subdivision, community action agency, or a limited partnership in which a community action agency is the sole general partner. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date. new text end